Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 8. Water Development Studies

§ 41-12-801.
Studies authorized for waters allocated by certain compacts.

In order to more fully utilize the waters allocated to the state of Wyoming by the Yellowstone River Compact (W.S.

41-12-601

), the Colorado River Compact (W.S.

41-12-301

), and the Upper Colorado River Compact (W.S.

41-12-401

), the state engineer is hereby directed to initiate studies to plan the development of these waters, including, but not limited to, transbasin diversions within the state wherever shown feasible as projects of the state of Wyoming. Such studies shall show the diligent intent of the state to fully utilize all of Wyoming’s compact share of the Big Horn River and its tributaries, the Green River and its tributaries, and other tributaries of the Colorado River within the boundaries of the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 137, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-512.7.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's New Instream Flow Act: An Administrative Quagmire,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1986).

Library references. —

18 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 3.